Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1384.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6329. Confinement in juvenile treatment facilities.(a) Limitation on room confinement.--(1) A staff member from the Bureau of Juvenile Justice Services within the Department of Human Services, the Bureau of Human Services Licensing within the Department of Human Services, a facility operated primarily for the detention of children who have been adjudicated delinquent or any other secure facility may not subject a child to room confinement for the purposes of discipline, punishment, retaliation, 12345678910111213141516 coercion, convenience due to staffing shortages, efficiency due to lack of administrative resources or any other reason as a result of:(i) a n adjudication of delinquency or disposition of the child ; or (ii) d etention of the child prior to the adjudication of delinquency or disposition of the child.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if room confinement is used as a temporary response to a child's behavior that poses a serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the child or another individual.(b) Techniques.--Before a child is placed in room confinement under this section, a staff member shall attempt to use less restrictive techniques, including:(1) Conversing with the child to de-escalate the serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the child or another individual.(2) Permitting a qualified mental health professional to converse with the child to de-escalate the serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the child or another individual.(3) Moving the child to another location where services can be provided not requiring room confinement that will de-escalate the serious and immediate risk of physical harm to child or another individual.(c) Explanation.--If a less restrictive technique under subsection (b) fails to de-escalate the serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the child or another individual, prior to placing the child in room confinement, a staff member shall inform the child of the following:20250HB1384PN1889 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The reasons why the child will be placed in room confinement.(2) That the child will be released from room confinement immediately when the child's behavior conforms to subsection (d)(1) or not later than after the expiration of the time period specified under subsection (d)(2), whichever occurs first.(d) Confinement period.--If a child is placed in room confinement, the child shall be released either:(1) upon a staff member determining that the child does not pose a serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the child or another individual; or(2) if the child does not control the child's behavior, not later than:(i) three hours after being placed in room confinement in the case of a child who poses a serious and immediate risk of physical harm to others; or(ii) thirty minutes after being placed in room confinement in the case of a child who poses a serious and immediate risk of physical harm to self.(e) Alternative strategies .--If the time period under subsection (d)(2) has expired and the child continues to pose a serious and immediate risk of physical harm to the child or another individu al, a licensed practitioner of the healing arts as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 5230.3 (relating to definitions) shall determine whether the child can be released from room confinement or whether alternative treatment strategies, such as inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, are necessar y. ( f ) Consecutive periods.--A child may not be subject to consecutive periods of room confinement.20250HB1384PN1889 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Notice to attorney.--If a child is placed in room confinement, the child's attorney shall be given notice of the room confinement by the next business day.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Consecutive periods." S uccessive placements of room confinement following one after another without interruptio n. "Room confinement." The involuntary placement of a child alone in a cell, room or other ar ea. "Temporary." No more than 15 minutes after being placed in room confinement.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1384PN1889 - 4 - 12345678910111213